Massachusetts, session 194th, S534.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 50 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, in line 10, after the word “caucuses” the
3 following words:- . The secretary shall create, implement and maintain a centralized digital
4 system into which each city and town clerk shall input preliminary results for each presidential
5 or state primary or election and which results shall be publicly viewable on the secretary’s
6 website on a single page immediately after input.
7 SECTION 2. Section 1F of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
8 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 7, the word “tenth” and inserting in
9 place thereof the following word:- seventh.
1 of 18

10 SECTION 3. Section 10 of said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
11 striking out, in lines 20, 21, 32, and 38, the word “thirty-fifth” each time it appears and inserting
12 in place thereof, in each instance, the following word:- forty-second.
13 SECTION 4. Section 26 of said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
14 striking out, in line 1, the words “forty-two H” and inserting in place thereof the following
15 word:- 42H.
16 SECTION 5. Said section 26 in said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby further
17 amended by striking out, in lines 8 and 9, the words “thirty-four and fifty” and inserting in place
18 thereof the following words: 34 and 50.
19 SECTION 6. Said section 26 in said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby further
20 amended by striking out, in lines 10 and 11, the word “tenth” each time in appears and inserting
21 in place thereof, in each instance, the following word: seventh.
22 SECTION 7. Said section 26 in said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby further
23 amended by striking out, in line 14, the words “forty-two G” and inserting in place thereof the
24 following words:- 42G.
25 SECTION 8. Section 42G½ of said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
26 striking out, in line 74, the figure “10” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 7.
27 SECTION 9. Section 44 of said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in line 7,
28 by inserting after the words “voter registration” the following words:- . A person registering as a
29 voter may, at the same time, establish their status as a permanent mail voter, as provided in
2 of 18

30 section 25C of chapter 54, by indicating their desire to elect such status on the affidavit of voter
31 registration.
32 SECTION 10. Said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out
33 section 47C and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
34 Section 47C. (a) The secretary of state shall maintain a central registry of voters in
35 accordance with this section.
36 (b) Information contained in the central registry shall be provided by the registrars or
37 equivalent in the commonwealth’s cities and towns.
38 (c) The central registry shall contain, without limitation, the following information about
39 each registered voter in the commonwealth: (1) full name; (2) former name, if any; (3) residential
40 address; (4) date of birth; (5) political party enrollment or designation; and (6) effective date of
41 registration.
42 (d) The central registry may contain, without limitation, the following information about
43 residents of the commonwealth age 16 and over: (1) full name; (2) former name, if any; (3)
44 residential address on January first in the current year; (4) residential address on January first in
45 the preceding year; (5) date of birth; (6) occupation; (7) veteran status; and (8) nationality, if not
46 a citizen of the United States, for street list purposes only.
47 (e) The central registry shall be digitally maintained using the most advanced applicable
48 technology reasonably available to the state secretary.
49 (f) The information contained in the central registry pursuant to paragraph (c) shall be:
50 (1) available to state party committees, statewide candidate committees, state ballot question
3 of 18

51 committees, the jury commissioner, adjutant general and any other individual, agency or entity
52 that the state secretary shall designate by regulation consistent with the purposes of this section,
53 at a fair and reasonable cost not to exceed the cost of printing in hard copy, if requested, or
54 issuing computer-readable data files; and (2) provided by the state secretary to the election
55 officials at each polling place in the commonwealth in digital format sufficient to allow for
56 designated election officials to conduct real-time searches of the registry and to modify a voter’s
57 registration information upon presentation by the voter of appropriate documentation to justify
58 the modification. The names and addresses contained in the central registry shall not be a matter
59 of public record.
60 (g) The state secretary shall use all reasonable efforts to secure federal funding to
61 maintain the central registry consistent with the provisions of this section and provide its
62 information as required in paragraph (f).
63 (h) The state secretary shall maintain an agreement with the Electronic Registration
64 Information Center, Inc. on behalf of the commonwealth that shall specify the terms and
65 conditions of the commonwealth’s membership in the Center. The agreement shall include terms
66 providing for the periodic sharing of data between the central registry, the registry of motor
67 vehicles and any other automatic voter registration agency as designated by the secretary, and the
68 Center, including, but not limited to, voter names and addresses.
69 (i) The state secretary shall adopt regulations governing the operation of the central
70 registry consistent with the provisions of this section.
71 SECTION 11. Section 60 of said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
72 adding at the end thereof the following sentence:- An electronic voting list may be used as the
4 of 18

73 primary voting list by a city or town clerk and at a ward, voting precinct, polling place or town
74 for any preliminary, primary or election; provided, however, that a paper copy of a voting list
75 may be used as a primary or duplicate list; and provided further, that the city or town clerk shall
76 have sole discretion over the format of the voting list used.
77 SECTION 12. Section 65 of said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
78 striking out subparagraph (3) of paragraph (d) and inserting in place thereof the following
79 paragraph:-
80 (3) The registrars shall notify each person under paragraph (1) of the person’s
81 opportunity to: (i) decline to register to vote; (ii) adopt a political party affiliation, in which case
82 the person shall also sign an eligibility requirement acknowledgement and attestation; and (iii)
83 become a permanent mail voter as provided in section 25C of chapter 54. Such notification shall
84 be provided in English and Spanish and any additional languages to be determined by the state
85 secretary. The registrars shall include with such notification a postage guaranteed permanent
86 mail voter status request form, as provided in section 25C of chapter 54.
87 SECTION 13. Section 28 of chapter 53 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
88 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place
89 thereof the following paragraph:-
90 State primaries shall be held on the second Tuesday in June in even-numbered years and
91 on the fourth Tuesday preceding special state elections, except that primaries before special
92 elections for senator or representative in congress shall be held on the sixth Tuesday preceding
93 said elections. If a religious holiday falls on or immediately before the second Tuesday in June in
94 an even-numbered year, the state primary shall be held on a date set by the general court within
5 of 18

95 seven days of the second Tuesday in June. The state secretary shall publish the date of the state
96 primary not later than February 1 of each even-numbered year by: (i) providing notice of the date
97 to the state parties; (ii) filing notice with the state publications and regulations division; (iii)
98 posting the information on the website of the state secretary; and (iv) any other means necessary
99 to ensure proper notification. Presidential primaries shall be held on the first Tuesday in March
100 in any year in which presidential electors are to be elected. Notwithstanding any provision of law
101 to the contrary, any town may hold its preliminary or regular town elections on the same date
102 designated as the date to hold a presidential primary, in any year in which presidential electors
103 are to be elected, or a state primary, in any even-numbered year, provided that such election is by
104 a ballot independent of the ballot used for a presidential primary or state primary. City and town
105 primaries before all city and town elections shall be held on the 28th day preceding such
106 elections.
107 SECTION 14. Section 33 of said chapter 53, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
108 adding, in line 3, after the word “printed” the following words:- . If a color has come to be
109 generally known or associated with a political party, the secretary shall use the associated color
110 for the party’s primary ballots.
111 SECTION 15. Section 24 of chapter 54 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
112 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the word “aldermen” each time it appears and
113 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- city council.
114 SECTION 16. Said section 24 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
115 amended by striking out the word “selectmen” each time it appears and inserting in place thereof,
116 in each instance, the following words:- select board or town council.
6 of 18

117 SECTION 17. Section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
118 striking out, in line 24, the words “during the calendar year” and inserting in place thereof the
119 following words:- for a single calendar year or permanently. Any qualified voter may become a
120 permanent mail voter by: (i) filing with the state secretary a permanent mail voter status request
121 in a form prescribed by the secretary and made available in paper and electronic formats; (ii)
122 indicating their request to establish permanent mail voter status on an affidavit of registration as
123 provided in section 44 of chapter 51; or (iii) opting into permanent mail voter status using the
124 secure online portal provided by the state secretary pursuant to this section. A permanent mail
125 voter who is not enrolled in a political party shall select their desired political party primary
126 ballot at the time permanent mail voter status is selected; provided, however, that a permanent
127 mail voter may request a different political party primary ballot for an upcoming election using
128 the secure online portal provided by the state secretary pursuant to paragraph (6); and provided
129 further, that the secretary shall prescribe a form and manner for submission of a paper request
130 that may be used by a permanent mail voter who is not enrolled in a political party to select a
131 different political party primary ballot for an upcoming election.
132 SECTION 18. Said section 25B of chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
133 in paragraph (a)(6) by striking out, in lines 92-96, the words “request that the ballot be mailed to
134 the voter’s home address, or a different mailing address as designated by the voter, or provided
135 electronically if the voter is approved to utilize an accessible electronic ballot as an
136 accommodation under paragraph (4)” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- : (i)
137 establish and terminate their status as a permanent mail voter; (ii) indicate whether the voter
138 would like to vote by mail for preliminaries, primaries or elections, or any combination thereof;
139 (iii) indicate that the voter would like to vote by mail in a single preliminary, primary or election
7 of 18

140 only; (iv) select a desired political party primary ballot, if the voter is not enrolled in a political
141 party; and (v) specify or change the physical address to which the ballot shall be mailed or
142 indicate the ballot should be provided electronically if the voter is approved to utilize an
143 accessible electronic ballot as an accommodation under paragraph (4).
144 SECTION 19. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
145 amended in paragraph (a)(7)(i) by striking out, in line 109, the words “or (B)” and inserting in
146 place thereof the following words:- (B) each annual or special municipal or state primary or
147 election for which they remain qualified to vote; or (C).
148 SECTION 20. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
149 amended by striking out, in line 111, the word “need” and inserting in place thereof the
150 following word:- shall.
151 SECTION 21. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
152 amended by adding, in line 111, after the word “to” the following words:- (A) a voter who is a
153 permanent mail voter; (B) a voter who indicated they do not want to vote by mail, for the
154 duration of that indication; or (C).
155 SECTION 22. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
156 amended in paragraph (a)(7)(ii) by striking out, in line 120, the words “and (E)” and inserting in
157 place thereof the following words:- (E) allow a voter to select permanent mail voter status, mail
158 voter status for a single calendar year, or mail voting for preliminaries, primaries or elections, or
159 any combination thereof; (F) indicate that the voter does not want to vote by mail for a period of
160 not more less than one nor more than four years; and (G).
8 of 18

161 SECTION 23. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
162 amended by striking out, in line 153, the words “appropriate local election officials” and
163 inserting in place thereof the following words:- state secretary.
164 SECTION 24. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
165 amended by adding, in line 156, after the word “ballot;” the following word:- and.
166 SECTION 25. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
167 amended by striking out, in line 156, the word “inner”.
168 SECTION 26. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
169 amended by striking out, in line 156, the words “; and (iv) an outer envelope that is pre-
170 addressed to” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- , as well as the address of.
171 SECTION 27. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
172 amended by striking out, in line 161, the word “outer”.
173 SECTION 28. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
174 amended in paragraph (a)(13) by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof
175 the following paragraph:-
176 All early voting ballots delivered in person to the office of the city or town clerk, returned
177 to a secured municipal drop box for the city or town where the voter is registered or returned
178 electronically pursuant to the accommodations granted to a voter by reason of disability under
179 paragraph (4) shall be received by the city or town clerk before the hour fixed for closing the
180 polls on the day of a preliminary, primary or election. All early voting ballots submitted by mail
181 shall be mailed by the voter on or before the day of a preliminary, primary or election and
9 of 18

182 accepted until 5:00 p.m. on the seventh day thereafter, and shall be processed in accordance with
183 section 95. A postmark, if legible, shall be evidence of the time of mailing.
184 SECTION 29. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
185 amended by striking out lines 192 to 205, inclusive, and inserting in place thereof the following
186 paragraph:-
187 (14) Upon receipt of a completed early voting ballot, the local election official shall
188 examine the completion of the affidavit on the envelope containing the ballot. If the affidavit has
189 been improperly executed or does not sufficiently indicate that the ballot was marked and mailed
190 or delivered as required by this section, the local election official shall mark across the face
191 thereof “Rejected as defective” and shall notify the voter and send the voter a new ballot. If the
192 affidavit has been properly executed, the local election official shall record the date of receipt.
193 SECTION 30. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
194 amended in subsection (a) by inserting the following new paragraphs:-
195 (15) The secretary shall maintain a public facing website for the confirmation of receipt
196 and acceptance of early voting ballots. The website shall automatically update based on data
197 inputted into the voter registration information system by local election officials. An early voting
198 ballot properly received pursuant to paragraph (14) shall be identified as “received” on the
199 website. An early voting ballot submitted into a tabulator without issue shall be identified as
200 “accepted” on the website.
201 (16) A voter may terminate their status as a permanent mail voter at any time by: (i) filing
202 with the state secretary a permanent mail voter termination request in a form prescribed by the
10 of 18

203 secretary and made available in paper and electronic formats; or (ii) so indicating using the
204 secure online portal provided by the state secretary pursuant to paragraph (6).
205 (17) Not later than January 25 in a year in which a presidential primary is held and not
206 later than April 25 in other even numbered years, the state secretary shall cause to be issued to
207 every permanent mail voter who submitted an email address to the state secretary an email
208 message containing a reminder to voters to reverify their mail voting information, including but
209 not limited to the address or addresses to which a voter’s ballots should be sent and the requested
210 party primary ballot, in the case of voters who are not enrolled in a political party. The email
211 message shall include a link to the portal provided by the state secretary pursuant to paragraph
212 (6).
213 (18) Each municipality shall maintain at least 1 secured municipal ballot drop box in a
214 public location that is accessible to voters for not less than 12 hours each day, including business
215 hours. A municipality with more than 25,000 registered voters shall maintain at least 1 secured
216 municipal ballot drop box for each 25,000 registered voters during any voting by mail period.
217 Locations for municipal ballot drop boxes shall be selected by the select board, town council or
218 city council to prioritize, to the extent feasible: (i) proximity to public transportation and
219 availability of parking; (ii) equitable distribution across population centers; (iii) access for
220 persons with disabilities; and (iv) use of public buildings. A municipality shall maintain such
221 ballot drop boxes from the earliest date that ballots become available to voters through the hour
222 fixed for the closing of the polls for any annual or special municipal or state primary or election.
223 A municipality with fewer than 5,000 registered voters in excess of any 25,000 registered voter
224 increment may apply to the state secretary for waiver of the requirement to maintain an
225 additional secured municipal ballot drop box for such population. The state secretary shall grant
11 of 18

226 a waiver application made under this paragraph upon a determination that the waiver would
227 serve the public interest.
228 SECTION 31. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
229 amended by striking out lines 215-257, inclusive, and inserting in place thereof the following
230 paragraphs:-
231 (2) For a biennial state election and any city or town election held on the same day as a
232 biennial state election, early voting in person shall be conducted not more than 17 days and not
233 less than 4 days preceding the election, as follows: (i) in municipalities with less than 1,000
234 registered voters, for not less than 8 total hours, including at least 2 weekend hours; (ii) in
235 municipalities with at least 1,000 but not more than 5,000 registered voters, for not less than 16
236 total hours, including at least 3 weekend hours; (iii) in municipalities with at least 5,000 but not
237 more than 25,000 registered voters, for not less than 24 total hours, including at least 4 weekend
238 hours; (iv) in municipalities with at least 25,000 but not more than 40,000 registered voters, for
239 not less than 32 total hours, including at least 6 weekend hours; (v) in municipalities with at least
240 40,000 and not more than 75,000 registered voters, for not less than 40 total hours, including at
241 least 8 weekend hours; and (iv) in municipalities with at least 75,000 registered voters, for not
242 less than 48 total hours, including at least 10 weekend hours. A city or town may, at the
243 discretion of the city or town clerk, provide for additional early voting hours beyond the hours
244 required by this paragraph.
245 (3) For any presidential or state primary and any city or town election held on the same
246 day, or any primary or election held pursuant to section 140 to fill a vacancy for senator or
247 representative in congress and any city or town election held on the same day, early voting in
12 of 18

248 person shall be conducted not more than 10 days and not less than 4 days preceding the primary
249 or election, as follows: (i) in municipalities with less than 1,000 registered voters, for not less
250 than 4 total hours, including at least 1 weekend hour; (ii) in municipalities with at least 1,000 but
251 not more than 5,000 registered voters, for not less than 8 total hours, including at least 2 weekend
252 hours; (ii) in municipalities with at least 5,000 but not more than 25,000 registered voters, for not
253 less than 12 total hours, including at least 3 weekend hours; (iii) in municipalities with at least
254 25,000 but not more than 40,000 registered voters, for not less than 16 total hours, including at
255 least 4 weekend hours; and (iv) in municipalities with 40,000 or more registered voters, for not
256 less than 20 total hours, including at least 5 weekend hours. A city or town may, at the discretion
257 of the city or town clerk, provide for additional early voting hours beyond the hours required by
258 this paragraph.
259 SECTION 32. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
260 amended by adding, in line 289, after the word “registrars” the following words:- . A digital list
261 shall satisfy the requirements of this paragraph.
262 SECTION 33. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
263 amended by striking out, in lines 294-295, the words “and an envelope containing an affidavit,
264 which shall include a notice of penalties under section 26 of chapter 56”.
265 SECTION 34. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
266 amended by striking out paragraph (b)(8) and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
267 (8) Upon marking their early voting ballot, the voter shall deposit the ballot into a tabulator.
268 SECTION 35. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
269 amended by striking out paragraph (c)(5) and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
13 of 18

270 (5) A voter voting early in person under this subsection shall be provided with a ballot and, upon
271 marking their early voting ballot, the voter shall deposit the ballot into a tabulator.
272 SECTION 36. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
273 amended by adding, in line 338, after the word “secretary” the following words:- . A paper list
274 may be required to be printed only on the first day of early voting.
275 SECTION 37. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
276 amended by adding, in line 342, after the word “death” the following words:- or move to a
277 different residence within the commonwealth.
278 SECTION 38. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
279 amended by striking out, in line 362, the words “deliver to each city and town” and inserting in
280 place thereof the following word:- prepare.
281 SECTION 39. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
282 amended by striking out, in line 369, the words “on their reverse”.
283 SECTION 40. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
284 amended by striking out, in line 370, the words “; (iii) return envelopes, pre-addressed to” and
285 inserting in place thereof the following words:- and the address of.
286 SECTION 41. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
287 amended by striking out, in line 372, the figure “(iv)” and inserting in place thereof the following
288 figure:- (iii).
14 of 18

289 SECTION 42. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
290 amended by adding, in line 378, after the word “tabulator” the following words:- upon receipt or
291 at any other time.
292 SECTION 43. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
293 amended by adding at the end thereof the following subsection:-
294 (l)(1) Not later than February 1 in each even numbered year, the commonwealth shall pay
295 to each city and town an amount sufficient to defray 80 per cent of the costs imposed on the city
296 or town under the provisions of this section in each even numbered year, including but not
297 limited to: (i) additional personnel hired to staff early in person voting; (ii) overtime for hourly
298 municipal personnel working outside their normal business hours to staff early in person voting,
299 set up or take down early voting polling locations, process early voting by mail ballots, input
300 data in the voter registration information system, or perform other essential functions related to
301 the operation of a preliminary, primary or election; and (iii) the cost of voting booths, privacy
302 screens, high speed tabulators, voter accessibility machines, and other technology essential to the
303 operation of a preliminary, primary or election.
304 (2) Not later than February 1 in each odd numbered year, the state auditor shall determine
305 the costs attributed to this section for each city and town during the 3 preceding even numbered
306 years and deliver to the state secretary, the chairs of the joint committee on election laws, the
307 chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means, and the clerks of the house and
308 senate a report stating the total costs for the 3 preceding even numbered years for each city and
309 town in the commonwealth, the three-cycle average for each city and town, 80 per cent of that
310 average, any anticipated total cost increases in the next even numbered year election cycle, and
15 of 18

311 the data giving rise to those calculations; provided, that the data may be contained in a digital
312 appendix. The state secretary shall include in his budget recommendations for the then-next
313 fiscal year a request for an appropriation in an amount equal to the total estimated municipal
314 costs. The secretary shall distribute to each city or town two disbursements of any such
315 appropriated funds: an initial disbursement consistent with the provisions of paragraph (1); and a
316 subsequent disbursement for the remainder of the costs incurred by each city or town. Funds so
317 distributed to each city or town shall be deposited into the elections operations or other similar
318 fund of the city or town and shall be expended without further appropriation by the city or town
319 to satisfy the costs incurred by it under the provisions of this chapter.
320 SECTION 44. Section 43 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
321 striking out, in line 2, the word “surnames” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
322 names.
323 SECTION 45. Section 72 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
324 striking out, in line 3, the word “shall” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- may.
325 SECTION 46. Section 95 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
326 adding, in line 2, after the word “tabulator” the following words:- upon receipt or at any other
327 time.
328 SECTION 47. Said section 95 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
329 amended by adding, in line 35, after the word “the” the following words:- tabulator or.
330 SECTION 48. Said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding, after
331 section 95, the following new section:-
16 of 18

332 Section 95A. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, city and town
333 clerks shall be permitted to remove early voting by mail ballots from their envelopes and deposit
334 the ballots into a tabulator or ballot box on any day upon which the ballots are timely received,
335 including but not limited to days prior to the close of the voter registration period.
336 SECTION 49. Said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding, after
337 section 162, the following new sections:-
338 Section 163. The state secretary’s name, photograph, likeness, or other personal
339 information shall not be used in any polling place or on any printed voting materials or election
340 information, including but not limited to materials about measures and questions submitted to
341 voters consistent with sections 52, 53 and 54 of this chapter, except to be listed on ballots as a
342 candidate for office.
343 Section 164. Not later than May 1 of every even numbered year, the state secretary shall
344 conduct comprehensive, culturally competent, and linguistically diverse voter education
345 outreach, both digitally and in paper copy. The voter education information contained in the
346 outreach program shall be updated to reflect any recent changes in elections laws or
347 implementation.
348 SECTION 50. Not later than December 31, 2025, the state secretary shall approve and
349 implement upgrades to the central registry and the voter registration information system and
350 approve and authorize the usage of electronic poll books. The upgraded voter registration
351 information system shall ensure that all voting methods, including early voting by mail, early
352 voting in person, and absentee voting, can be tracked together.
17 of 18

353 SECTION 51. There shall be a special commission to examine the automatic voter
354 registration processes of the commonwealth, including the processes implemented via the
355 registry of motor vehicles. The commission shall be comprised of the following members: the
356 president of the Massachusetts town clerks association, or their designee, who shall serve as
357 chair; the secretary of the commonwealth, or their designee; the registrar of motor vehicles, or
358 their designee; the chairs of the joint committee on election laws, or their respective designees;
359 the executive director of common cause Massachusetts; the elections and voting legislative
360 specialists of the league of women voters of Massachusetts; 2 members appointed by the senate
361 president, 1 of whom shall represent a voting rights advocacy organization; 2 members appointed
362 by the speaker of the house of representatives, 1 of whom shall be a city clerk in the
363 commonwealth; and not more than 3 additional members to be appointed by the chair. Not later
364 than April 15, 2026, the commission shall issue a report containing its findings about automatic
365 voter registration process improvements, including but not limited to any recommended
366 legislative changes, to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the chairs of the
367 joint committee on election laws and the clerks of the house and senate. The secretary shall
368 publish the report on his website.
369 SECTION 52. Not later than June 30, 2026, the state secretary shall mail to all registered
370 voters at their residential addresses, or mailing addresses if different from their residential
371 addresses listed in the central registry of voters, a permanent mail voter status request form as
372 provided in section 25B of chapter 54 of the General Laws. The mailing shall: (i) include clear
373 instructions for completing and returning the application; (ii) allow a voter to designate the
374 mailing address to which their ballots shall be sent; and (iii) be pre-addressed to the local
375 election official with postage guaranteed.
18 of 18